Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2148
Insurer; supervision, rehabilitation, and liquidation.

If it appears to the director that any person has committed a violation of the Insurance Holding Company System Act which so impairs the financial condition of a domestic insurer as to threaten insolvency or make the further transaction of business by it hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, or shareholders or the public, the director may proceed as provided in the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act to take possession of the property of such domestic insurer and to conduct the business thereof.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 28.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.